California statutes. Water Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [71300. - 71314.]

71300.

All powers, privileges, and duties of a district shall be exercised and performed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71301.

Any executive, administrative, and ministerial powers may be delegated and redelegated by the board to any of the offices created by this part or by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71302.

The board may fix the time and place or places at which its regular meetings will be held, and shall provide for the calling and holding of special meetings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71303.

The board may fix the location of the principal place of business of the district and the location of all offices and departments maintained under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71304.

The board may prescribe by ordinance a system of business administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71305.

The board may create any necessary offices and establish and re-establish the powers, duties, and compensation of all officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71306.

The board may require and fix the amount of all official bonds necessary for the protection of the funds and property of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71307.

The board may prescribe by ordinance a system of civil service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71308.

The board may by ordinance delegate and redelegate to the officers of the district the power to employ clerical, legal, and engineering assistants and labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71309.

The board may by ordinance delegate and redelegate to officers of the district, under such conditions and restrictions as shall be fixed by the board, the power to bind the district by contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71310.

The board may prescribe a method of auditing and allowing or rejecting claims and demands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71311.

The board shall designate a depository or depositories to have the custody of the funds of the district. All such depositories shall give security sufficient to secure the district against possible loss and shall pay the warrants drawn by the treasurer for demands against the district under such rules as the directors may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71312.

The board of a district in existence on the effective date of this section shall file a certificate with the Secretary of State on or before January 1, 1964, listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district organized contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the board may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

If the certificate filed with the Secretary of State stating that the proposition for formation of the district was adopted contains all of the information required by this section, no further certificate need be filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

71312.5.

A district may issue bonds, borrow money, and incur indebtedness as authorized by law or this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

71313.

A district may refund such bonds, loans, or indebtedness (by the issuance of the same obligations following the same procedure) or retire any indebtedness or lien that may exist against the district or its property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

71314.

A district may insure its directors, officers, assistants, employees, agents, and deputies for injury, death, or disability incurred while engaged in the business of the district and the cost of such insurance is a proper charge against the district. Such insurance is in addition to any compensation secured under the provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code and inuring to the benefit of the director, officer, deputy, assistant, employee, or agent, or his beneficiary or heir.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Officers and Employees [71340. - 71365.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [71340. - 71342.]

71340.

At its first meeting, or as soon thereafter as practicable, the board shall appoint, by a majority vote, a secretary, treasurer, attorney, general manager, and auditor, and shall define their duties and fix their compensation. The board may at any meeting appoint a deputy secretary and a deputy treasurer.

Each of these officers shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

71341.

The board may employ such additional assistants and employees as it deems necessary to efficiently maintain and operate the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71341.5.

(a) A district may employ park rangers who shall have the authority and powers conferred by subdivision (d) of Section 830.34 of the Penal Code upon peace officers.

(b) For the purposes of carrying out subdivision (a), the district shall adhere to the standards for recruitment and training of peace officers established by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Title 4 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 4 of the Penal Code.

(c) Every park ranger employed by a district shall conform to the standards for peace officers adopted by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training. Any park ranger who fails to conform to those standards shall not have the powers of a peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

71342.

The board may consolidate the offices of secretary and treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Duties [71360. - 71365.]

71360.

The president and secretary, in addition to the duties imposed on them by law, shall perform such duties as may be imposed on them by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71361.

The treasurer, or such other person or persons as may be authorized by the board, shall draw checks or warrants to pay demands when such demands have been audited and approved in the manner prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71362.

Subject to the approval of the Board of Directors, the general manager shall have full charge and control of the maintenance, operation, and construction of the waterworks or waterworks system of the district, with full power and authority to employ and discharge all employees and assistants, other than those referred to in Section 71340, at pleasure, prescribe their duties, and fix their compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

71363.

The general manager shall perform such duties as may be imposed on him by the board. He shall report to the board in accordance with such rules and regulations as it may adopt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------

71364.

The attorney shall be the legal adviser of the district and shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71365.

The general manager, secretary, and treasurer, and other employees or assistants of the district designated by the board, shall give such bonds to the district conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties as the board from time to time may provide. The premiums on the bonds shall be paid by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ELECTIONS [71450. - 71540.]



  CHAPTER 1. Elections Generally [71450. - 71454.]

71450.

As used in this part:

(a) “District election” means every election held within the district for district purposes, but does not include a formation election.

(b) “General district election” means the district election for the election of directors which shall be held in each even-numbered year at the time of the general election and consolidated therewith.

(c) “Special district election” means any district election other than the general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 7, Sec. 5.   Effective February 8, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

71451.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, the provisions of the Elections Code, so far as they may be applicable, shall govern all district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71452.

The board shall call and canvass all elections involving matters of initiative and referendum and shall call all other elections which it is authorized to canvass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71453.

No person shall vote at any district election unless he is a voter residing in the division of the district in which he casts his vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71454.

Except with respect to formation elections, whenever lands situated in more than one county are included in a district:

(a) The secretary shall perform all duties prescribed by law to be performed by county clerks or registrars of voters, as the case may be, in connection with district elections.

(b) Where necessary, the secretary is authorized to procure from the proper county officials all necessary registration books and copies of indexes thereof. 

(c) The board shall perform all duties prescribed by law to be performed by boards of supervisors in connection with district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Preparation of Ballots [71461. - 71463.]

71461.

In counties in which districts are located, the county elections official may have printed upon the official ballots provided for voters at elections for directors a heading in the same form as that provided by the Elections Code for nonpartisan officers. The heading shall be marked “Municipal Water District,” with a subheading “For a Member of the Board of Directors, Division ________ (here inserting the number of the division)—Vote for One,” and beneath which shall appear the names of the candidates for the office of director for that division of the district, with the appropriate blank space for the writing in of the name of a candidate if desired by the voters, and with a voting square placed opposite the space.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 203.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

71462.

The ballots provided for voters at elections for directors shall be furnished by the precinct officers only to those voters within their respective precincts who appear on the register as duly registered voters within the affected division of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71463.

In precincts which lie only partly within a district, the precinct board shall be supplied with two kinds of ballots by the county elections official, one of which shall contain the matters set forth in Section 71461 for the use of voters of the district, and the other of which shall not contain the matters set forth in Section 71461 and shall be furnished to those voters of the precinct who are not voters of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 204.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Precincts and Polling Places [71473. - 71473.]

71473.

If any district election is consolidated with any state or county election, the voting precincts, polling places, and election officers for the district election shall be the same as those established for the state or county election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Election of Directors [71500. - 71512.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [71500. - 71505.]

71500.

The successors to the first directors shall be elected or chosen at the times and in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71501.

One director, who shall be a resident of the division and shall be elected by the voters thereof, shall be elected for each of the five divisions of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71502.

Except as to the election of the first directors, directors shall be elected at the general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 7, Sec. 6.   Effective February 8, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

71503.

Each candidate for director who at the general district election receives the highest number of votes cast for the candidate for that office is elected as a director of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 7, Sec. 7.   Effective February 8, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

71505.

Candidates shall declare their candidacy and shall be nominated, election returns shall be canvassed, the election shall be held and conducted, the results shall be declared, and the certificates of election shall be issued, in the same manner as the declaration of candidacy, nomination, election, canvassing of returns, declaration of results, and issuance of certificates of election are made, declared, held, and conducted, and issued, under the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 264.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appointment in Lieu of Election [71512. - 71512.]

71512.

A person appointed to office of director shall qualify and take office and serve exactly as if elected at a general district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Initiative, Referendum, and Recall [71530. - 71531.]

71530.

Ordinances may be passed by the voters of a district in accordance with the methods provided by the Elections Code for direct legislation in cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71531.

Ordinances may be disapproved and vetoed by the voters of a district in accordance with the methods provided by the Elections Code for protesting against legislation in cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Relocation of Division Boundaries [71540. - 71540.]

71540.

The board of directors shall, by resolution, adjust the boundaries of any divisions pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 435, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. POWERS AND PURPOSES [71590. - 71760.]



  CHAPTER 1. Powers Generally [71590. - 71601.]

71590.

A district may exercise the powers which are expressly granted by this division or are necessarily implied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71591.

A district may:

(a) Have perpetual succession.

(b) Adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71592.

A district may make contracts, employ labor, and do all acts necessary for the full exercise of its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71593.

A district may provide by ordinance for the pensioning of officers or employees, for the terms and conditions under which such pensions shall be awarded, and for the time and extent of service of officers or employees before such pensions shall be available to them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71594.

A district may, in the ordinance providing for the pensioning of officers and employees, create a special fund for the purpose of paying such pensions and provide for the accumulation of contributions to this fund from revenues of the district, wages of officers or employees, voluntary contributions, gifts, donations, or any source of revenue not inconsistent with the general powers of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71595.

A district may contract with any insurance corporation, the State Employees’ Retirement System, or any other insurance carrier for the maintenance of a service covering the pension of the district officers or employees and for their health and accident insurance coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

71596.

A district may disseminate information concerning the rights, properties, and activities of the district. Such power shall not be construed as an exception to the California Public Records Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71597.

A district may by resolution of a four-fifths majority of its directors obtain membership in associations having for their purpose the furtherance of subjects relating to the powers and duties of the district and for the interchange of information relating to such powers and duties. Funds necessary for such purposes may be appropriated.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the provisions of this section are declaratory of existing law except insofar as they specify that a resolution of a four-fifths majority of the directors is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1057.)
-------------------------------------------

71598.

A district may, by resolution of the board of directors spread on its minutes, change the name of the district. Certified copies of the resolution changing the name of the district shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of every affected county and sent to the county clerk of every affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

71599.

If, on or after the effective date of this section, substantially all of a district water system is acquired by another public agency by any method other than a vote of the electorate of that district so authorizing, the following provisions shall apply:

(a) All funds derived from the operation of the former district system shall be separately accounted for and used exclusively for the purposes of maintenance, operation, betterments, and bond debt service of the acquired system.

(b) No funds derived from the former district system shall be used for any other such purpose until all debt of that former system has been paid in full or until a majority vote of the electorate of the area served by that former system has authorized such other expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

71600.

Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of any local ordinance or regulation adopted pursuant to this division shall be punished upon a first conviction by a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50) and for a second conviction within a period of one year by a fine of not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) and for a third or any subsequent conviction within a period of one year by a fine of not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 387.)
-------------------------------------------

71601.

(a) In order to enforce the provisions of any ordinance of the district, including an ordinance fixing charges for the furnishing of commodities or services, the district may correct any violation of an ordinance of the district. The district may also petition the superior court for the issuance of a preliminary or permanent injunction, or both, as may be appropriate, restraining any person from the continued violation of any ordinance of the district or for the issuance of an order stopping or disconnecting a service if the charges for that service are unpaid at the time specified in the ordinance.

(b) The district may enter upon the private property of any person within the jurisdiction of the district in order to investigate possible violations of an ordinance of the district. The investigation shall be made with the consent of the owner or tenant of the property or, if consent is refused, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to the procedures set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that, notwithstanding Section 1822.52 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the warrant shall be issued only upon probable cause.

(c) The district shall notify the county or city building inspector, county health inspector, or other affected county or city employee or office, in writing, within a reasonable time if an actual violation of a district, city, or county ordinance is discovered during the investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 798, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Water [71610. - 71644.]



  ARTICLE 1. Development and Sale [71610. - 71618.]

71610.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a district may acquire, control, distribute, store, spread, sink, treat, purify, recycle, recapture, and salvage any water, including sewage and storm waters, for the beneficial use or uses of the district, its inhabitants, or the owners of rights to water in the district.

(b) For a district located in a county with a population greater than 8 million persons and where 80 percent of the area of the district is included within the boundaries of a water replenishment district organized pursuant to Division 18 (commencing with Section 60000), the district shall have no authority to do any of the following:

(1) Manage, control, or administer the importation of water for the storage of groundwater.

(2) Store water underground except pursuant to either of the following:

(A) A contract with an independent holder of adjudicated groundwater extraction rights within the boundaries of the district and for the account of the water rights holder.

(B) A court order issued by a court having jurisdiction over the adjudication of groundwater extraction rights within the groundwater basin where storage is sought.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.   (SB 1386)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

71610.5.

A district may undertake a water conservation program to reduce water use and may require, as a condition of new service, that reasonable water-saving devices and water reclamation devices be installed to reduce water use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 893.)
-------------------------------------------

71611.

A district may sell water under its control, without preference, to cities, other public corporations and agencies, and persons, within the district for use within the district. As used in this part, the term “water” includes potable water and nonpotable water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

71611.5.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), upon the request of an Indian tribe and the satisfaction of the conditions stated in subdivision (b), a district shall provide service of water at substantially the same terms applicable to the customers of the district to an Indian tribe’s lands that are not within a district as if the lands had been fully annexed into the district and into any other public agencies required for the provision of water service if the Indian tribe’s lands meet all of the following requirements:

(A) The lands were owned by the tribe on January 1, 2016.

(B) The lands are contiguous with at
 least two districts.

(C) The lands lie within the special study area of at least one district.

(D) At least 70 percent of the Indian tribe’s total Indian lands are currently within the boundaries of one or more districts.

(2) (A) Upon the request of an Indian tribe that does not meet the requirements of paragraph (1) and upon the satisfaction of the conditions stated in subdivision (b), a district may, until January 1, 2027, apply to the applicable local agency formation commission to extend water service at substantially the same
 terms applicable to customers of the district to Indian lands that are not within a district as if the lands had been fully annexed into the district and into any other public agencies required for the provision of water service. The local agency formation commission shall approve the application and may impose conditions on the district with regard to the extension of service in accordance with Section 56886 of the Government Code, as long as those terms and conditions do not impair the provision of water service to Indian lands pursuant to this section and are similar to those imposed on all agency service recipients without discrimination. A district shall provide the water extension agreement to the local agency formation commission.

(B) A local agency formation commission shall not approve an application on or after January 1,
 2027. A district that received authorization to extend water service to Indian lands pursuant to subparagraph (A) may continue to do so after January 1, 2027, provided that the district continues to comply with the conditions imposed by the local agency formation commission.

(C) For purposes of this subdivision, “Indian lands” means Indian lands, as defined in Section 2703 of Title 25 of the United States Code, that are part of a reservation or held in
 trust.

(b) Before a district provides service of water pursuant to this section, the Indian tribe shall satisfy all of the following conditions:

(1) The Indian tribe complies with all federal and tribal laws.

(2) The Indian tribe acquires all federal and tribal approvals necessary for the applicable district to provide water service to the tribal lands on substantially the same terms applicable to customers of the district.

(3) The Indian tribe accepts, by agreement, all terms of, and payments, including service payments, to, the district and any public agency providing water to said district, as if the Indian tribe’s lands
 were fully annexed into the district and into the service area of any other public agency, which terms and payments are also a condition of continued service by a district and by any public agency providing water to said district.

(c) If a district provides service of water to an Indian tribe’s lands pursuant to this section, the service areas of the district and of any public agencies providing water to the district are deemed for all purposes to include the Indian tribe’s lands for the longest of the following periods of time:

(1) The time service of water is provided by the district to the Indian tribe.

(2) The time moneys are owed by the Indian tribe to the district for the service of water.

(3) The term of any agreement between the district and the Indian tribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   (AB 2081)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71612.

Whenever the board finds that there is a surplus of water above that which may be required by consumers within the district, the district may sell or otherwise dispose of such surplus water to any persons, public corporations or agencies, or other consumers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71612.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Marin Municipal Water District may sell water to any person, firm, public or private corporation, or public agency or other consumer within or without the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 933, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

71613.

A district may supply and deliver water to property not subject to district taxes at special rates, terms, and conditions as are determined by the board for such service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

71614.

A district may fix the rates at which water shall be sold. Different rates may be established for different classes or conditions of service, but rates shall be uniform throughout the district for like classes and conditions of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71615.

Any special water rate fixed in accordance with the terms and conditions of an annexation shall be deemed to be a rate for a different class or condition of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71616.

A district, so far as practicable, shall fix such rates for water in the district, and in each improvement district therein, as will result in revenues which will:

(a) Pay the operating expenses of the district and the improvement district. 

(b) Provide for repairs and depreciation of works.

(c) Provide a reasonable surplus for improvements, extensions, and enlargements.

(d) Pay the interest on any bonded debt.

(e) Provide a sinking or other fund for the payment of the principal of such bonded debt as it becomes due.

(f) Repay advances, together with interest at a rate not to exceed the interest value of money to the district, made from the district to an improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

71617.

The rates for water in each improvement district may vary from the rates of the district and from other improvement districts therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

71618.

No district furnishing water for residential use to a tenant shall seek to recover any charges or penalties for the furnishing of water to or for the tenant’s residential use from any subsequent tenant on account of nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant. The district may, however, require that service to subsequent tenants be furnished on the account of the landlord or property owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1251, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Standby Charges [71630. - 71637.]

71630.

The district by ordinance may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix on or before the third Monday of August, in each fiscal year, a water standby assessment or availability charge in the district, in any portion thereof, or in any improvement district, to which water is made available by the district, whether the water is actually used or not.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

71631.

The standby assessment or availability charge shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) per acre per year for each acre of land on which the charge is levied or ten dollars ($10) per year for a parcel less than one acre.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

71631.5.

Notwithstanding Section 71631, in any improvement district situated within the Eastern Municipal Water District, the Western Municipal Water District of Riverside County, the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District, the Rincon Del Diablo Municipal Water District, the Ramona Municipal Water District, the Rainbow Municipal Water District, or the Lake Hemet Municipal Water District, the standby assessment or availability charge shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year for land on which the charge is levied or thirty dollars ($30) per year for a parcel less than one acre. In any such improvement district, the proceeds from any standby assessment or availability charge in excess of ten dollars ($10) per acre per year or ten dollars ($10) per year for a parcel less than one acre shall only be used for the purposes of such improvement district.

This section, applicable only to the Eastern Municipal Water District, the Western Municipal Water District of Riverside County, the Elsinore Valley Municipal Water District, the Rincon Del Diablo Municipal Water District, the Ramona Municipal Water District, the Rainbow Municipal Water District, and the Lake Hemet Municipal Water District, is necessary because of the unique and special water management problems of those areas included within those districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 267, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

71631.6.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 71631, in any improvement district situated within the Otay Municipal Water District in San Diego County, the standby assessment or availability charge shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year for land on which the charge is levied or ten dollars ($10) per year for a parcel less than one acre. In any such improvement district the proceeds from any standby assessment or availability charge in excess of ten dollars ($10) per acre per year shall only be used for the purposes of such improvement district.

This section, applicable only to the Otay Municipal Water District of San Diego County is necessary because of the unique and special water management problems of the area included within such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 281.)
-------------------------------------------

71631.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 71631, for the San Luis Rey Municipal Water District, the standby assessment or availability charge shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year for land on which the charge is levied or thirty dollars ($30) per year for a parcel less than one acre. The proceeds from any standby assessment or availability charge shall only be used for the purposes of management of local water supply and its quality.

(b) This section, applicable only to the San Luis Rey Municipal Water District, is necessary because of the unique and special
 water management problems of those areas included within that district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 818, Sec. 1.   (AB 2446)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

71632.

The ordinance fixing a standby assessment or availability charge shall be adopted by the board pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code and only after adoption of a resolution setting forth the particular schedule or schedules of charges or assessments proposed to be established by ordinance and after a hearing on said resolution.

If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby assessment or availability charge was established were followed, the board may, by ordinance, continue the charge pursuant to this article in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

71633.

The ordinance fixing a standby assessment or availability charge may establish schedules varying the charges according to land uses, water uses, and degree of water availability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 105.)
-------------------------------------------

71634.

On or before the third Monday in August, the board shall furnish in writing to the board of supervisors and the county auditor of each affected county a description of each parcel of land within the district upon which a standby charge is to be levied and collected for the current fiscal year, together with the amount of standby charge fixed by the district on each parcel of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

71635.

The board shall direct that, at the time and in the manner required by law for the levying of taxes for county purposes the board of supervisors shall levy, in addition to any other tax it levies, the standby charge in the amounts for the respective parcels fixed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

71636.

All county officers charged with the duty of collecting taxes shall collect district standby charges with the regular tax payments to the county. Said charges shall be collected in the same form and manner as county taxes are collected, and shall be paid to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

71637.

Charges fixed by the district shall be a lien on all the property benefited thereby. Liens for said charges shall be of the same force and effect as other liens for taxes, and their collection may be enforced by the same means as provided for the enforcement of liens for state and county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 132.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Alternative Provisions for Standby Charges [71638. - 71638.4.]

71638.

If the procedures set forth in this article as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the district or improvement district may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this article in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district or improvement district shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

71638.1.
